Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2096
Interference with enforcement; penalty.

(1) Any person who prevents or interferes with or attempts to impede in any way any duly authorized representative of the department in the lawful enforcement of sections 71-2084 to 71-2096 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor. For purposes of this subsection, lawful enforcement includes, but is not limited to, (a) contacting or interviewing any resident or patient of a health care facility in private at any reasonable hour and without advance notice, (b) examining any relevant books or records of a health care facility, or (c) preserving evidence of any violations of sections 71-2084 to 71-2096.

(2) The county attorney of the county in which the health care facility is located or the Attorney General may be requested by the department to initiate prosecution.

Laws 1983, LB 274, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-6007;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 72;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 522.